Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462.355, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no decision adopting, amending, or authorizing a comprehensive plan is subject to the requirements of chapter 116D. Nothing in this subdivision exempts individual projects, as defined by Minnesota Rules, part 4410.0200, subpart 65, from the requirements of chapter 116D and applicable rules. new text end new text begin (b) A comprehensive plan adopted by a municipality under sections 462.351 to 462.364 does not constitute conduct that causes or is likely to cause pollution, impairment, or destruction as defined under section 116B.02, subdivision 5. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to all comprehensive plans and amendments adopted by any municipality, as defined under Minnesota Statutes, section 462.352, subdivision 2, on or after that date. new text end